District of Columbia statutes.
38-824.02a

Interscholastic athletics plan.

(a)

On or before February 15, 2013, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall transmit to the Council a strategic plan for increasing access to, participation in, and the quality of an interscholastic athletics program in District of Columbia Public Schools and public charter schools by the 2014-2015 school year.

(b)

The strategic plan shall include a description of:

(1)

The level of programs needed to ensure greater access to interscholastic athletics;

(2)

The resources required to operate a robust interscholastic athletics program throughout the public schools;

(3)

How District facilities may be better utilized to provide for interscholastic athletics; and

(4)

The effect of a robust athletics program on student health and community involvement.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 402a
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 4062(i), 59 DCR 8025
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.
For temporary addition of section, see § 4062(i) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290), applicable as of June 20, 2012.
Section 4063 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that § 4062 of the act shall apply as of June 20, 2012.